New Jersey, session 221, A864.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance shall conduct an investigation of practices of the automobile insurance industry of this State in regard to increases in automobile insurance premiums for drivers who have had motor vehicle drivers license suspensions and prepare a comparison between increases for drivers whose suspensions are for offenses relating to driving and increases for drivers whose suspensions are for offenses not related to driving.  As part of the investigation, the commissioner shall evaluate the use of credit ratings and addresses in determining automobile insurance premiums for drivers.  In performing the investigation, the commissioner shall determine whether factors such as non-driving related suspensions and credit ratings justify an increase in automobile insurance premiums.  A report of the findings of the investigation shall be transmitted to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature no later than two years after the start of the investigation. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month after enactment and shall expire on the 90th day following transmittal of the report required by section 1 of this act.